Utah statutes.
16-17-205.   Termination of listing of commercial registered agent.
(1)  A commercial registered agent may terminate its listing as a commercial
registered agent by filing with the division a commercial registered agent
termination statement signed by or on behalf of the agent which states:
(a)  the name of the agent as currently listed under Section 16-17-204; and
(b)  that the agent is no longer in the business of serving as a commercial
registered agent in this state.
(2)  A commercial registered agent termination statement takes effect on the
31st day after the day on which it is filed.
(3)  The commercial registered agent shall promptly furnish each entity
represented by it with notice in a record of the filing of the commercial
registered agent termination statement.
(4)  When a commercial registered agent termination statement takes effect,
the registered agent ceases to be an agent for service of process on each
entity formerly represented by it.  Until an entity formerly represented by a
terminated commercial registered agent appoints a new registered agent,
service of process may be made on the entity as provided in Section 16-17-301.
Termination of the listing of a commercial registered agent under this section
does not affect any contractual rights a represented entity may have against
the agent or that the agent may have against the entity.
